Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 6 Public Defender
§ 7-6-106.
Determination of need; reimbursement for services.

The determination of whether a person covered by W.S.

7-6-104

is a needy person shall be deferred until his first appearance in court or in a suit for payment or reimbursement under W.S.

7-6-108

, whichever occurs earlier. Thereafter, the court shall determine, with respect to each proceeding, whether he is a needy person. For purposes of this section, an appeal, probation revocation or proceeding to correct or modify a sentence is a separate proceeding. The determination of need shall be based on a separate application submitted at the time of each proceeding.

In determining whether a person is a needy person and in determining the extent of his inability to pay, and, in the case of an unemancipated minor, the inability to pay of his custodial parent or another person who has a legal obligation of support, the court shall consider the standards set forth in subsections (f) through (h) of this section and Rule 44(d), Wyoming Rules of Criminal Procedure. Release on bail does not necessarily prevent a person from being determined to be needy. In each case the person, subject to the penalties for perjury, shall certify in writing, or by other record, the material factors relating to his ability to pay as the court prescribes.

In every case in which a person has received services under W.S.

7-6-104

, the presiding judge shall determine whether the person or, in the case of an unemancipated minor, his custodial parent or any other person who has a legal obligation of support, is able to provide any funds towards payment of part or all of the cost associated with such services. If the person or, in the case of an unemancipated minor, his custodial parent or any other person who has a legal obligation of support, is not able to provide any funds towards payment of costs, the court shall enter a specific finding on the record. If the court determines the person or, in the case of an unemancipated minor, his custodial parent or any other person who has a legal obligation of support, is able to provide any amount as reimbursement, the court shall order the person or, in the case of an unemancipated minor, his custodial parent or any other person who has a legal obligation of support, to reimburse the state for all or part of the costs of the services provided or shall state on the record the reasons why an order for reimbursement was not entered. Where a person is initially provided with counsel pursuant to W.S. 7-6-105(a), but subsequently retains private counsel, the court may order the person to reimburse the state for the services already provided. All reimbursements under this act shall be made through the clerk of court.

The state public defender shall report in the agency’s annual report concerning:

The number of cases by court in which an attorney was appointed to represent a person at public expense under this act during the preceding calendar quarter;

For each case in which an attorney was appointed, whether the court ordered reimbursement under this section or, if reimbursement was not ordered, whether the court complied with subsection (c) of this section;

Repealed by Laws 2020, ch. 122, § 3.

If the court orders release on bail pending trial or appeal, probation before sentence, suspended sentence or probation, the court shall order the needy person as a condition of bail, sentence or probation to repay the state for expenses and services provided by appointed attorneys pursuant to the state public defender’s standard fee schedule if the court determines the defendant has an ability to pay or that a reasonable probability exists that the defendant will have an ability to pay.

The following income standards shall be used to determine whether a person is needy for purposes of this article:

A person whose annual gross income is less than one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the current federally established poverty level for his immediate family unit is needy;

A person whose annual gross income is between one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) and two hundred eighteen percent (218%) of the current federally established poverty level for his immediate family unit may be deemed needy;

A person whose annual gross income is greater than two hundred eighteen percent (218%) of the current federally established poverty level for his immediate family unit shall not be deemed needy under this article.

Notwithstanding subsection (f) of this section, a person may be deemed needy if the person is charged with a felony and the court, in its discretion, determines on the record after consideration of the standards set forth in Rule 44(d), Wyoming Rules of Criminal Procedure that extraordinary circumstances exist such that the person is entitled to representation.

Notwithstanding subsection (f) of this section, a person shall be presumed needy if:

He receives at least one (1) of the following types of public assistance:

Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF);

Emergency Aid to Elderly, Disabled and Children (EAEDC);

Poverty related veteran’s benefits;

Supplemental nutrition assistance program;

Medicaid;

Supplemental Security Income (SSI).

He resides in a public mental health facility and has no available funds or liquid assets;

He is serving a sentence in a state correctional institution and has no available funds or liquid assets; or

He is in custody in a county jail and has no available funds or liquid assets.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 170, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-9.22; W.S. 1977, § 7-1-112; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; ch. 176, § 1; 1991, ch. 155, § 1; ch. 167, § 2; 1996, ch. 1, § 312; 1998, ch. 30, § 314; 1999, ch. 95, § 1; 2012, ch. 76, § 3; 2013 ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2020 ch. 34, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 122, § 3, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2012 amendment,

added (d)(iii) and made related change.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “set forth in Rule 44(d), Wyoming Rules of Criminal Procedure” for “promulgated pursuant to W.S. 7-6-103(c)(vii) in (b).

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, by ch. 34, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, in (b) added “subsections (f) through (h) of this section and” preceding “Rule 44(d)”; and added (f) through (h).

The second 2020 amendment, by ch. 122, § 3, effective July 1, 2020, repealed (d)(iii), which read “For the guardian ad litem program, the number of cases, the amount of monies expended and the amounts of reimbursements from participating counties.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Cross references. —

As to penalty for perjury, see §

6-5-301

.

Amended Sentence.—

Construction.—

Sentence Not Illegal.—

Amended Sentence.—

District court had the authority on remand to amend defendant's sentence because the amended sentence was consistent with the district court's original sentence and merely reconfirmed that the statutorily-mandated fees remained part of defendant sentence; the statutory assessments were imposed because defendant had been convicted of a crime, and on remand, he still was convicted of a crime.
Hawes v. State, 2016 WY 30, 368 P.3d 879,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 2016 WY 30,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 2016).

Construction.—

Statutes indicate that the fees are imposed as a result of being convicted in a criminal case, not as part of the sentence for any particular crime; the statutes envision that sentencing courts impose the mandated fees separately as part of the overall sentence, rather than as part of the sentence for an individual charge.
Hawes v. State, 2016 WY 30, 368 P.3d 879,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 2016 WY 30,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 2016).

Sentence Not Illegal.—

District court properly denied defendant's motions to correct an illegal sentence because there was no increase in punishment and no violation of his double jeopardy protections; all of the fees imposed upon defendant's conviction were mandated by statute, and thus, it was unnecessary for the district court to attach the fees to the stalking charge in the initial sentence.
Hawes v. State, 2016 WY 30, 368 P.3d 879,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 2016 WY 30,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 2016).

Express findings concerning statutory factors required. —

When read together, as they must be, the provisions of this section require that the trial court make express findings concerning the factors set forth in the statutory language. Juarez v. State, 791 P.2d 287,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1990).

Specific conclusion not required. —

Subsection (c) of this section does not require a sentencing court to make a specific oral or written conclusion that defendant has the ability to pay for court-appointed counsel. Nixon v. State, 4 P.3d 864,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 2000).

District court did not violate any clear rule of law in ordering defendant to reimburse the State for his public defender fees because: (1) the legislative intent was that sentencing courts were to presume a present or future ability to pay unless a defendant proved otherwise, and (2) no evidence was presented to suggest that defendant did not or would not have the ability to pay.
Glover v. State, 2007 WY 169, 169 P.3d 553,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 182

(Wyo. 2007).

Payment of expenses may be compelled. —

Subsection (c) of this section authorizes a court order to compel payment by the defendant of such amount as he is able to provide for necessary expenses of representation after determination of need, as provided in subsection (a) of this section and § 7-1-110(b) (repealed). Phillips v. State, 553 P.2d 1037,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 210

(Wyo. 1976).

The court can order payment of attorney's fees and defense expenses when defense services are first provided at defendant's initial appearance in court, or after a lawsuit has determined the rightful owner of money seized from the defendant, or after an action determines that the state is entitled to reimbursement. Phillips v. State, 553 P.2d 1037,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 210

(Wyo. 1976).

But defendant must be afforded due process. —

A court exceeds its authority in ordering money seized from the defendant held at the sentencing hearing for payment of defense services without any due process afforded the defendant. Phillips v. State, 553 P.2d 1037,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 210

(Wyo. 1976).

Defendant's rights violated. —

Proper inquiries were not made to determine whether defendant wanted to be represented by appointed counsel; rather the court merely queried whether defendant intended to represent himself, hire an attorney, or ask the court to consider appointment of a public defender, and when defendant said he made about $1,000 a month, the court ordered that he sign a waiver of his right to assistance of counsel. Wilkie v. State, 2002 WY 164, 56 P.3d 1023,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. 2002).

Future ability to repay costs of court-appointed counsel. —

Trial court's order to repay costs of court-appointed counsel must be reasonable, and consideration of reasonableness may include future ability to pay. Nixon v. State, 4 P.3d 864,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 2000).

No repayment without determining ability to pay. —

The district court erred in ordering the defendant to repay the state for the services of a public defender without first determining the defendant's ability to pay. King v. State, 780 P.2d 943,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 202

(Wyo. 1989) (decided prior to 1991 amendments).

Ability to pay includes a foreseeable ability to pay. —

The statute does not require any more than the district court finding that a defendant has or will have an ability to pay, and the ability to pay is not limited to present ability, but includes a foreseeable ability to pay. James v. State, 998 P.2d 389,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 2000).

Court cannot assess prosecution costs. —

Because the legislature, in enacting §

6-10-104

, specifically deleted the language permitting assessment of costs of prosecution, the trial judge exceeded his authority by assessing costs of prosecution as a condition of probation. Burke v. State, 746 P.2d 852,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 550

(Wyo. 1987) (decided under facts existing prior to 1987 revision).

Nor require reimbursement for public defender. —

The district court erred by requiring the defendant to reimburse the state for the services of her public defender as a condition of her probation. Burke v. State, 746 P.2d 852,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 550

(Wyo. 1987)Burke v. State, 746 P.2d 852,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 550

(Wyo. 1987) (decided under facts existing prior to 1987 revision).

No reimbursement through forfeiture. —

District court erred in ordering reimbursement of public defender's office to be partially paid from forfeiture of defendant's truck, since relevant statutes did not authorize such an action. Mitchell v. State, 982 P.2d 717,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 1999).

No reimbursement for costs where crime pre-1987. —

The district court could not require defendant to make reimbursement for the costs of court-appointed counsel, where the crime which he committed occurred before the effective date of subsection (d), May 22, 1987. Schiefer v. State, 774 P.2d 133,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1989).

Nor for appeal costs. —

The statutes make no provision for assessment of attorney fees by the district court upon conclusion of the appeal. Schiefer v. State, 774 P.2d 133,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1989).

Record must demonstrate new attorney fees computed. —

Because the record provided no evidence demonstrating how the defense attorney fee reimbursement charge was computed, including hourly rate, time or any lode star itemization, the order for reimbursement failed. Seaton v. State, 811 P.2d 276,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 1991).

Applied

in

Billis v. State, 800 P.2d 401,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1990).

Quoted

in

Smith v. State, 902 P.2d 1271,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1995).

Cited

in

Jones v. State, 771 P.2d 368,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 1989); Keller v. State, 771 P.2d 379,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 1989); Penner v. State, 2003 WY 143, 78 P.3d 1045,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 2003); Penner v. State, 2003 WY 143, 78 P.3d 1045,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 2003).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Recovery under state law of attorney's fees by lay pro se litigant, 14 ALR5th 947.

§ 7-6-107.
Waiver of rights.

A person who has been advised of his rights under W.S.

7-6-105

may waive any right provided by this act if at the time of or after waiver, the court finds that the person has acted with full awareness of his rights and of the consequences of a waiver and if the waiver is otherwise made according to law. Before making its findings, the court shall consider such factors as the person’s age, education, familiarity with the English language and the complexity of the crime involved. A person who knowingly and voluntarily waives his right to counsel and who elects to represent himself shall not be entitled to standby counsel under this act.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 170, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-9.23; W.S. 1977, § 7-1-113; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; ch. 176, § 1; 1999, ch. 95, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence, see § 7-6-102(a)(vi).

Waiver of counsel. —

The record demonstrates that defendant knowingly waived his right to representation by the Public Defender and chose to represent himself, even though the inquiry by the court into the defendant's understanding of the issues may have been less than complete. Mapp v. State, 953 P.2d 140,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1998).

Waiver by conduct. —

A waiver of counsel by conduct is not knowingly and voluntarily made when defendant has not been warned that waiver will be the result of his continued dilatory and obstructive behavior. Trujillo v. State, 2 P.3d 567,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. 2000).

Applied

in

Van Riper v. State, 882 P.2d 230,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. 1994); Wilkie v. State, 2002 WY 164, 56 P.3d 1023,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. 2002).

Cited

in

Jandro v. State, 781 P.2d 512,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 212

(Wyo. 1989); Reifer v. State, 2014 WY 139,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Nov. 5, 2014).

§ 7-6-108.
Recovery of payment.

Within six (6) years after the date the services were rendered, the attorney general may sue on behalf of the state to recover payment or reimbursement from each person who has received legal assistance or other benefits under this act or, in the case of an unemancipated minor, from his custodial parent or any other person who has a legal obligation of support.

Amounts recovered under this act shall be paid into the state general fund.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 170, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-9.24; W.S. 1977, § 7-1-114; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; ch. 176, § 1; 1999, ch. 95, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a), see § 7-6-102(a)(vi).

Payment of expenses may be compelled. —

The court can order payment of attorney's fees and defense expenses when defense services are first provided at defendant's initial appearance in court, or after a lawsuit has determined the rightful owner of money seized from the defendant, or after an action under this section determines that the state is entitled to reimbursement. Phillips v. State, 553 P.2d 1037,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 210

(Wyo. 1976).

But defendant must be afforded due process. —

A court exceeds its authority in ordering money seized from the defendant held at the sentencing hearing for payment of defense expenses without any due process afforded the defendant. Phillips v. State, 553 P.2d 1037,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 210

(Wyo. 1976).

Applicability.—

There was no merit to the claim that the Department was required to seek reimbursement pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

7-6-108

as appellant failed to show that the original judgment and sentencing orders were not valid orders. Heinemann v. State, 2018 WY 31, 413 P.3d 644,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 2018).

Applied

in

Burke v. State, 746 P.2d 852,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 550

(Wyo. 1987).

Stated

in

King v. State, 780 P.2d 943,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 202

(Wyo. 1989).

Cited

in

Jones v. State, 771 P.2d 368,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 1989); Keller v. State, 771 P.2d 379,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 1989).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Recovery under state law of attorney's fees by lay pro se litigant, 14 ALR5th 947.

§ 7-6-109.
Appointment of outside attorney.

Nothing in this act shall prevent a court on its own motion or upon application by the state public defender or by the individual defendant, from appointing an attorney other than the public defender to represent the defendant or to assist in the representation of the defendant at any stage of the proceedings or on appeal.

If a court assigns an attorney to represent a needy person, it may recommend a reasonable rate of compensation for his services and shall determine the direct expenses for which he should be reimbursed. The state public defender shall consider the court’s recommendation and the customary compensation as prescribed by the standard fee schedule promulgated pursuant to W.S. 7-6-103(c)(vi), and shall pay the appointed attorney for his services when the case for which he was appointed is concluded.

An attorney appointed under subsection (b) of this section shall be compensated for his services with regard to the complexity of the issues, the time involved, prevailing local fees of attorneys, the amount reasonably necessary to provide a defense as is required by constitutional process and other relevant considerations as determined by the court.

If a defendant initially retains counsel and then requests the provision of counsel or any other defense services, including but not limited to mental evaluations, expert witnesses and witness travel expenses, the court shall make a determination whether the defendant is a “needy person” under this act, subject to the following:

The procedures set forth in W.S.

7-6-106

shall be followed;

The court shall make the findings required by W.S.

7-6-106

and rule 44 of the Wyoming Rules of Criminal Procedure;

The defendant shall complete an affidavit or otherwise disclose on the record his entire financial situation, including the amount he has already paid to retain defense counsel, the source of those funds and whether additional funds are available to him through any means;

The defendant shall disclose the disposition of any retainer and any amounts remaining; and

The state public defender shall be served by the defendant’s retained counsel with a copy of any such request and shall be heard by the court prior to any decision on the request.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 170, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-9.25; W.S. 1977, § 7-1-115; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; ch. 176, § 1; 1999, ch. 95, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a), see § 7-6-102(a)(vi).

County responsible for payment of guardian ad litem fees. —

A guardian ad litem appointed pursuant to §

14-6-216

, because the interests of the juvenile party's mother were adverse to the interests of the juvenile party, should have been paid by the county for service as a guardian ad litem, and not by the public defender; public defender is responsible for payment of guardian ad litem fees only when one is appointed to provide additional representation on the delinquency allegation pursuant to this section. Munker v. Juvenile Court, Seventh Judicial Dist., 837 P.2d 676,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 1992).

Quoted

in

State v. Board of County Comm'rs, 642 P.2d 456,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 317

(Wyo. 1982).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction of state statutes providing for compensation of attorney appointed by court to defend indigent accused, 18 ALR3d 1074.

Modern status of rules and standards in state courts as to adequacy of defense counsel's representation of criminal client, 2 ALR4th 27.

Power of court to change counsel appointed for indigent, against objections of accused and original counsel, 3 ALR4th 1227.

§ 7-6-110.
Use of state or private facilities.

The public defender or an appointed defending attorney is entitled to use the same state facilities for the evaluation of evidence as are available to the prosecuting attorney. If it appears the use of state facilities is unavailable or inappropriate, the court may authorize the use of private facilities to be paid for by the state public defender.

When the public defender or an appointed defending attorney requests service of process from the sheriff, no fees shall be charged for such service.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 170, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-9.26; W.S. 1977, § 7-1-116; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; ch. 176, § 1; 1999, ch. 95, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of indigent defendant in state criminal case to assistance of chemist, toxicologist, technician, narcotics expert or similar nonmedical specialist in substance analysis, 74 ALR4th 388.

§ 7-6-111.
Office space.

The county commissioners of each county shall provide suitable office space and utility services, other than telephone service, for the use of the state public defender and his assistants. If suitable office space for all assistant public defenders cannot be provided, the county commissioners shall provide a monthly stipend to all assistants housed in private facilities.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 170, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-9.27; W.S. 1977, § 7-1-117; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; ch. 176, § 1; 1999, ch. 95, § 1.

§ 7-6-112.
Applicability of provisions.

This act does not apply to:

Matters arising out of an action pending in the juvenile courts of this state unless it is in a juvenile delinquency proceeding or a child in need of supervision proceeding;

Representation of an individual in proceedings for hospitalization of mentally ill persons under W.S.

25-10-101

through

25-10-127

;

Representation of a person charged in municipal court with violation of a municipal ordinance;

Representation of a person in a federal court, except pursuant to W.S. 7-6-104(c)(ii);

Repealed by Laws 2020, ch. 122, § 3.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 170, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-9.28; W.S. 1977, § 7-1-118; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; ch. 176, § 1; 1999, ch. 95, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2012, ch. 76, § 3; 2013 ch. 171, § 1, effective March 13, 2013; 2020 ch. 122, § 3, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(ii), substituted “25-10-127” for “25-10-126.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, §
4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Laws 2012, ch. 76 § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2012.

The 2012 amendment,

added (a)(v) and made related change.

The 2013 amendment,

in (a)(i) added “or a child in need of supervision proceeding”.

Laws 2013, ch. 171, § 1, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 2, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2013.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, repealed (a)(v), which read “Administration of the guardian ad litem program under W.S.

14-12-101

through

14-12-104

, except as provided in W.S. 7-6-103(c)(viii) and 7-6-106(d)(iii).”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in the introductory language of subsection (a), see § 7-6-102(a)(vi).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

County responsible for payment of guardian ad litem fees. —

A guardian ad litem appointed pursuant to §

14-6-216

, because the interests of the juvenile party's mother were adverse to the interests of the juvenile party, should have been paid by the county for service as a guardian ad litem, and not by the public defender; public defender is responsible for payment of guardian ad litem fees only when one is appointed to provide additional representation on the delinquency allegation pursuant to §

7-6-109

.Munker v. Juvenile Court, Seventh Judicial Dist., 837 P.2d 676,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 1992).

§ 7-6-113.
Funding.

The total state and federal funding of the public defender program shall be eighty-five percent (85%) of the state public defender budget.

Each county shall appropriate funds to supplement the state public defender budget in accordance with an equitable formula determined by the state public defender and the state budget department in cooperation with the legislative service office, taking into account the following factors:

The population of each county;

The assessed valuation of each county; and

The serious crime case load of each county.

The total amount of money collected from the counties shall equal fifteen percent (15%) of the state public defender budget. The state public defender shall notify each county of its proportional share and shall by June 30 of each fiscal year invoice the county for its proportionate share. In the event a county does not make payments within ninety (90) days, the state treasurer may deduct the amount from sales tax revenues due to the county from the state and shall credit the amount to the general fund.

Repealed by Laws 2020, ch. 122, § 3.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 170, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-9.29; W.S. 1977, § 7-1-119; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; ch. 176, § 1; 1991, ch. 29, § 3; 1999, ch. 95, § 1; 2003, ch. 189, § 1; 2009, ch. 170, § 1; 2012, ch. 76, § 3; 2020 ch. 122, § 3, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to budget division, see §

9-2-1004

.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “based on the latest federal census as periodically updated by the bureau of the census” from the end in (b)(i).

The 2012 amendment,

added (d).

Laws 2012, ch. 76 § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2012.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, repealed (d), which read “The provisions of this section shall not be applicable to the guardian ad litem program administered by the office of the public defender and the budget for that program shall be as provided in W.S.

14-12-101

through

14-12-104

.”

The 2021 amendment,

in (b), added "state" following "defender and the," deleted "division of the" preceding "department" and "of administration and information" preceding "in cooperation."

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009 ch 170 § 3 provides:

“(a) No authority to issue any license based upon population shall be diminished by application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.

“(b) No distribution of funding shall be diminished or increased based upon application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.
To the extent any entity's share of funding would be reduced or increased by application of this act before that time, the distribution of funds shall be administered in accordance with the provisions of law prior to the amendment or repeal of such law by this act.”

§ 7-6-114.
Other legal protections or sanctions.

The protections provided by this act do not exclude any protection or sanction that the law otherwise provides.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 170, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-9.31; W.S. 1977, § 7-1-121; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; ch. 176, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 7-6-102(a)(vi).

Cited

in

Penner v. State, 2003 WY 143, 78 P.3d 1045,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 2003); Penner v. State, 2003 WY 143, 78 P.3d 1045,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 2003).